Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 6
RIGHT TO ATTEND SENTENCING

16-11-601. Right to attend sentencing.

The victim of any crime or a relative of the victim, if the victim has died, has the right to attend all sentencing proceedings resulting from a conviction of said crime under any laws of this state. Said person has the right to appear, personally or with counsel, at the sentencing proceeding and to adequately and reasonably express his or her views concerning the crime, the defendant, the need for restitution, and the type of sentence which should be imposed by the court. The court, in imposing sentence, shall consider the statements of such person and shall make a finding, on the record, as to whether or not the defendant would pose a threat to public safety if granted probation.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire part added, p. 499, § 1, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the right to attend parole hearings, see § 17-2-214; for the right to attend dispositional, review, and restitution proceedings under the "Colorado Children's Code", see § 19-2-112.